Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8616
Transfer of property to commission; contracts and agreements; effect.

(1) All property, equipment, supplies, and personnel which belonged to, were allocated to, or were used to support the Division of Rehabilitation Services for the Visually Impaired within the Department of Health and Human Services prior to July 1, 2000, are transferred to the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired.

(2) All existing contracts and agreements in effect on July 1, 2000, as to the Division of Rehabilitation Services for the Visually Impaired within the Department of Health and Human Services are binding and effective upon the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 16.